04_Morphology/esp.twol
Alphabet

A B C D E F G H I J K L M N Ñ O P Q R S T U Ü V W X Y Z Á É Í Ó Ú
a b c d e F g h i j k l m n ñ o p Q r s t u ü v w x y z á é í ó ú

%{s%}:s
%{s%}:es
;

Sets

sPlural = A B C E F G H I K M Ñ O P Q T U Ü V W X Á É Í Ó Ú
          a b c e F g h i k m ñ o p Q t u ü v w x á é í ó ú;

Rules 

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"z to c in plural"
z:c <=> _ %>:;

"s plural after certain consonants"
%{s%}:s <=> sPlural %>: _;
